Louisiana, session 2026, HB1066.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:1667.1(A)(2)(a) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
§1667.1. Rate of compensation; prior service; supplemental monthly compensation;
police to receive additional compensation
A.
* * *
(2)(a)(i) Every sworn, commissioned law enforcement officer employed on
a full-time basis by a bona fide police agency of the state or its political subdivisions,
other than the Department of Public Safety and Corrections and the Department of
Wildlife and Fisheries, and headquartered in either the city of New Orleans or Lake
Charles, and who serves the welfare of the public in the capacity of a police officer
by providing police services to the general public through effecting arrests, issuing
citations, and serving warrants while patrolling levees, waterways, and riverfront
areas, or while patrolling bridges that are within the boundaries of the city of New
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1371 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 1066
Orleans or the city of Lake Charles shall be paid by the state extra compensation in
the amount of six hundred dollars per month in addition to the compensation now
paid to him by his employer out of self-generated revenue attributable to the agency
employing such officers. To be eligible for the extra compensation, each such law
enforcement officer shall have completed one year of service, and any such law
enforcement officer hired after March 31, 1986, shall also have completed and
passed a council-certified training program, as provided in R.S. 40:2405.
(ii) The provisions of Item (i) of this Subparagraph shall not apply to a law
enforcement officer employed by the Department of Public Safety and Corrections,
the Department of Wildlife and Fisheries, or a public postsecondary education
institution.
* * *
Section 2. This Act shall take effect and become operative if and when the Act
which originated as House Bill No. 981 of this 2026 Regular Session of the Legislature is
enacted and becomes effective.